Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 3 Consideration

13-3-40.
Necessity for consideration; presumption of consideration.

A consideration is essential to a contract which the law will enforce. An executory contract without such consideration is called nudum pactum or a naked promise.

In some cases a consideration is presumed, and an averment to the contrary will not be received.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2703; Code 1868, § 2697; Code 1873, § 2739; Code 1882, § 2739; Civil Code 1895, § 3656; Civil Code 1910, § 4241; Code 1933, § 20-301.

13-3-41.
Types of consideration.

Considerations are distinguished into “good” and “valuable.” A good consideration is such as is founded on natural duty and affection or on a strong moral obligation. A valuable consideration is founded on money or something convertible into money or having a value in money, except marriage, which is a valuable consideration.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2705; Code 1868, § 2699; Code 1873, § 2741; Code 1882, § 2741; Civil Code 1895, § 3658; Civil Code 1910, § 4243; Code 1933, § 20-303.

13-3-42.
Acts which constitute consideration; effect of consideration given or received by persons other than promisor or promisee.

To constitute consideration, a performance or a return promise must be bargained for by the parties to a contract.

A performance or return promise is bargained for if it is sought by the promisor in exchange for his promise and is given by the promisee in exchange for that promise.

The performance may consist of:

An act other than a promise;

A forbearance; or

The creation, modification, or destruction of a legal relation.

The performance or return promise may be given to the promisor or to some other person. If there is a valid consideration for a promise, it does not matter from whom it moves and it may be given by the promisee or by some other person; the promisee may sustain his action, though a stranger to the consideration.

In mutual subscriptions for a common object, the promise of the others is a good consideration for the promise of each.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2704, 2708, 2711; Code 1868, §§ 2698, 2702, 2705; Code 1873, §§ 2740, 2744, 2747; Code 1882, §§ 2740, 2744, 2747; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3657, 3661, 3664; Civil Code 1910, §§ 4242, 4246, 4249; Code 1933, §§ 20-302, 20-304, 20-306; Ga. L. 1981, p. 876, § 2.

13-3-43.
Effect of satisfying requirement of consideration.

If the requirement of consideration is met, there is no additional requirement of a gain, advantage, or benefit to the promisor or of a loss, disadvantage, or detriment to the promisee.

History.
Code 1933, § 20-302.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 876, § 2.

13-3-44.
Effect of promise which is reasonably expected to induce action or forbearance by promisee or third person; requirement as to proof of reliance in cases of charitable subscriptions or marriage settlements.

A promise which the promisor should reasonably expect to induce action or forbearance on the part of the promisee or a third person and which does induce such action or forbearance is binding if injustice can be avoided only by enforcement of the promise. The remedy granted for breach may be limited as justice requires.

A charitable subscription or a marriage settlement is binding under subsection (a) of this Code section without proof that the promise induced action or forbearance.

History.
Code 1933, § 20-302.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 876, § 2.

13-3-45.
Effect of partially valid consideration; effect of illegal consideration.

If the consideration is good in part and void in part, the promise will or will not be sustained, depending upon whether it is entire or severable. If the consideration is illegal in whole or in part, the whole promise fails.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2709; Code 1868, § 2703; Code 1873, § 2745; Code 1882, § 2745; Civil Code 1895, § 3662; Civil Code 1910, § 4247; Code 1933, § 20-305.

13-3-46.
Effect of inadequacy of consideration.

Mere inadequacy of consideration alone will not void a contract. If the inadequacy is great, it is a strong circumstance to evidence fraud; and, in an action for damages for breach of a contract, the inadequacy of consideration will always enter as an element in estimating the damages.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2706; Code 1868, § 2700; Code 1873, § 2742; Code 1882, § 2742; Civil Code 1895, § 3659; Civil Code 1910, § 4244; Code 1933, § 20-307.

13-3-47.
Effect of impossible and possible but improbable consideration.

An impossible consideration is insufficient to sustain any promise; however, if the consideration is possible but improbable, it is sufficient to sustain the promise.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2710; Code 1868, § 2704; Code 1873, § 2746; Code 1882, § 2746; Civil Code 1895, § 3663; Civil Code 1910, § 4248; Code 1933, § 20-309.